Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-153
Kimball.

The county of Kimball is bounded as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of section three in township number sixteen, north, of range fifty-three, west; thence due west on the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen, north, to a point where said line intersects the east boundary line of the State of Wyoming; thence south along the west boundary line of the State of Nebraska to a point where the said line intersects the north boundary line of the State of Colorado; thence east along the south boundary line of the State of Nebraska to a point where said line intersects a line extending due north on the section line between sections sixteen and seventeen, township twelve, north, range fifty-three, west; thence north to the northwest corner of section four, in township twelve, north, of range fifty-three, west; thence due east to the southeast corner of section thirty-four in township thirteen, north, of range fifty-three, west; and thence due north to the place of beginning.

Formed from Cheyenne County pursuant to Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 6, 1888;

R.S.1913, § 866;

C.S.1922, § 768;

C.S.1929, § 25-155;

R.S.1943, § 22-153.